fr: Code de taille du composant: 01005; 0201; 0402; 0603; 0805; 1206; 1210; 1812; 2220; Radial; Autre
tr: Bileşen boyut kodu: 01005; 0201; 0402; 0603; 0805; 1206; 1210; 1812; 2220; Radyal; Diğer
fi: Komponentin kokokoodi: 01005; 0201; 0402; 0603; 0805; 1206; 1210; 1812; 2220; Säteittäinen; Muu
cs: Kód velikosti součástky: 01005; 0201; 0402; 0603; 0805; 1206; 1210; 1812; 2220; Radiální; Jiné
da: Komponentstørrelseskode: 01005; 0201; 0402; 0603; 0805; 1206; 1210; 1812; 2220; Radial; Andet
sv: Komponentstorlekskod: 01005; 0201; 0402; 0603; 0805; 1206; 1210; 1812; 2220; Radiell; Övrigt
en: Component size code: 01005; 0201; 0402; 0603; 0805; 1206; 1210; 1812; 2220; Radial; Other
lt-LT: Komponento dydžio kodas: 01005; 0201; 0402; 0603; 0805; 1206; 1210; 1812; 2220; Radialinė; Kita
es: Código de tamaño del componente: 01005; 0201; 0402; 0603; 0805; 1206; 1210; 1812; 2220; Radial; Otros
zh-TW: 元件尺寸代碼: 01005; 0201; 0402; 0603; 0805; 1206; 1210; 1812; 2220; 徑向; 其他
sl-SI: Koda velikosti komponente: 01005; 0201; 0402; 0603; 0805; 1206; 1210; 1812; 2220; Radialni; Drugo
it: Codice dimensione del componente: 01005; 0201; 0402; 0603; 0805; 1206; 1210; 1812; 2220; Radiale; Altro
pt-PT: Código de tamanho do componente: 01005; 0201; 0402; 0603; 0805; 1206; 1210; 1812; 2220; Radial; Outro
ro-RO: Cod dimensiune componentă: 01005; 0201; 0402; 0603; 0805; 1206; 1210; 1812; 2220; Radială; Altele
vi: Mã kích thước linh kiện: 01005; 0201; 0402; 0603; 0805; 1206; 1210; 1812; 2220; Hình tia; Khác
sk-SK: Kód veľkosti súčiastky: 01005; 0201; 0402; 0603; 0805; 1206; 1210; 1812; 2220; Radiálny; Iné
th: รหัสขนาดส่วนประกอบ: 01005; 0201; 0402; 0603; 0805; 1206; 1210; 1812; 2220; แบบรัศมี; อื่นๆ
el: Κωδικός μεγέθους εξαρτήματος: 01005; 0201; 0402; 0603; 0805; 1206; 1210; 1812; 2220; Ακτινωτό; Άλλο
nl: Component maatcode: 01005; 0201; 0402; 0603; 0805; 1206; 1210; 1812; 2220; Radiaal; Andere
pt-BR: Código de tamanho do componente: 01005; 0201; 0402; 0603; 0805; 1206; 1210; 1812; 2220; Radial; Outro
pl: Kod rozmiaru komponentu: 01005; 0201; 0402; 0603; 0805; 1206; 1210; 1812; 2220; Promieniowe; Inne
zh-CN: 组件尺寸代码: 01005; 0201; 0402; 0603; 0805; 1206; 1210; 1812; 2220; 径向; 其他
ja: コンポーネントサイズコード: 01005; 0201; 0402; 0603; 0805; 1206; 1210; 1812; 2220; ラジアル; その他
ru: Код размера компонента: 01005; 0201; 0402; 0603; 0805; 1206; 1210; 1812; 2220; Радиальный; Другой
hu: Komponensméretkód: 01005; 0201; 0402; 0603; 0805; 1206; 1210; 1812; 2220; Radiális; Egyéb
ko: 컴포넌트 크기 코드: 01005; 0201; 0402; 0603; 0805; 1206; 1210; 1812; 2220; 방사형; 기타
nb: Komponentstørrelseskode: 01005; 0201; 0402; 0603; 0805; 1206; 1210; 1812; 2220; Radial; Annet
bg-BG: Код за размер на компонента: 01005; 0201; 0402; 0603; 0805; 1206; 1210; 1812; 2220; Радиална; Други
hr-HR: Kod veličine komponente: 01005; 0201; 0402; 0603; 0805; 1206; 1210; 1812; 2220; Radijalan; Ostalo
de: Komponenten-Größencode: 01005; 0201; 0402; 0603; 0805; 1206; 1210; 1812; 2220; Radial; Sonstiges